Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.410

Amended foreign registration statement.

A foreign corporation registered to conduct affairs in this state shall amend its foreign registration statement under the circumstances specified in RCW 23.95.515.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4127; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 82.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.